New York, session 2025-2026, A1490.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 606 of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subsection (e-3) to read as follows: 3 (e-3) Retired disabled police officer credit. (1) For taxable years 4 beginning on and after January first, two thousand twenty-six, a resi- 5 dent taxpayer who was a police officer in this state who was retired for 6 disability shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this 7 article equal to seven hundred fifty dollars. 8 (2) If the amount of the credit allowed under this subsection for any 9 taxable year shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for such year, the excess 10 shall be treated as an overpayment of tax to be credited or refunded in 11 accordance with the provisions of section six hundred eighty-six of this 12 article, provided, however, that no interest shall be paid thereon. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01114-01-5